Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 2

Road Work by Inmates

41-22-201. Road work authorized.

The commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to contract with the commissioner of transportation for the use of any or all inmates, except those for which it is undesirable or impracticable in the opinion of those officials, to work outside the walls of the main prison in constructing any new or maintaining any old public road in this state.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-501.

Cross-References. Felons and other prisoners to work on roads, §§ 41-2-123 — 41-2-125.

Inmate labor for private purposes, §§ 41-2-148, 41-3-106.

Regional state workhouses, title 41, ch. 1, part 6.

Use of prison labor by department of transportation, § 54-5-128.

Volunteer prisoner work program, title 4, ch. 6, part 2.

41-22-202. Purchase of necessary equipment — Temporary stockades — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor, is authorized and directed to purchase equipment, such as tools, road working machinery and motor trucks for the speedy transfer of the inmates from one point to another, that may become necessary in the judgment of the commissioner to effectually and economically carry out §§ 41-22-201 — 41-22-204.

The commissioner is further authorized and directed to build temporary stockades in which to safely keep and house the prisoners working under the provisions of §§ 41-22-201 — 41-22-204 and to make such rules and regulations regarding their well being and safekeeping as in the commissioner's opinion are necessary.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-502.

41-22-203. Interdepartmental compensation.

The commissioner of transportation shall pay the commissioner of correction for the use of inmates employed under §§ 41-22-201 — 41-22-204 out of the highway fund or any other fund under the commissioner of transportation's control. The commissioner of correction shall in turn, except as provided in this part, pay the moneys so received into the state treasury, where they shall be credited to the department of correction.

The rate of pay shall not exceed the department of correction expenditures necessary to enable such inmates to perform the contracted labor while ensuring adequate security, plus an additional amount to be determined by the commissioners of correction and transportation for the purpose of funding § 41-22-204, but not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the amount paid by the department of transportation to the department of correction.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-503.

41-22-204. Special compensation for inmates.

The additional amount prescribed in § 41-22-203 shall be kept and reserved in a special fund for the use and benefit of the inmates so employed. This fund is to be reserved by the commissioner of correction and with the approval of the governor, to be used in making payments to deserving inmates, on a fair proportionate basis or to their dependents, in such sums and at such times as may be considered by the commissioner proper in order to reward good conduct, give the stimulus of hope to the inmates and best encourage them in discipline and efficiency.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-504.

41-22-205. Census of inmates for road work.

On or before March 1 of each year, the commissioner of correction shall prepare a census of all male inmates in the custody of the department who, in the commissioner's judgment, are available for work on the county roads and highways of the state and shall also make an estimate of the men who will be available by additions during the road working season.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-505.

41-22-206. Notification to counties — Preparation for work — Terms and conditions of employment.

When the census provided for in § 41-22-205 is completed, the county mayor of each county shall be notified by the commissioner of correction that certain inmates of the penitentiaries are available and subject to be employed upon the county roads, pikes and highways of the counties and that the county mayor may apply for the inmates' services, upon such terms and conditions as may be required by the commissioner. The county mayor may fix and select the quarters and shall prepare equipment for the working of the inmates on the county roads, pikes and highways that will be maintained, controlled, and operated by the county mayor. Whenever any county enters into a contract with the commissioner for employment of inmates of the penitentiaries, the inmates and all machinery used by them shall be under the absolute control of such officers as may be designated and provided by the commissioner, but the inmates shall be worked on such roads, pikes or highways as may be designated by the county employing them.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-506; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-22-207. Contract with county.

The commissioner of correction may, in the commissioner's discretion, contract with a county for building highways, if that work is being done with state allocated funds. Such a contract shall be made only upon the authority of the governor and upon the approval of the commissioner of transportation, and all work under the contract shall be performed by inmates of the penitentiaries.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-507.

41-22-208. Consideration of applications.

In the event two (2) or more counties make application for inmate labor, the applications shall be considered in the order in which filed with the commissioner of correction; provided, that the commissioner may reject any application if the commissioner determine that the inmates can be used to better advantage.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-508.

41-22-209. Rate of compensation — Payment of expenses.

The rate of compensation for the labor of inmates of the penitentiaries shall be fixed and determined by the commissioner of correction and by the county legislative body entering into the contract and shall be in accordance with rules and regulations to be prescribed by the commissioner; provided, that the rate of compensation shall not be less than one dollar ($1.00) per day of ten (10) hours for labor of each inmate employed on the work.

The commissioner is authorized to pay all necessary transportation of inmates, guards and equipment out of the correction budget.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-509.

41-22-210. Provision of equipment.

The commissioner of correction is authorized to purchase and provide all necessary equipment for the working of prisoners on the county roads, pikes and highways, and the equipment shall be paid out of the correction budget.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-510.

41-22-211. Period during which road work may be done.

Inmate employment and operation in road work may be during the period beginning April 1 and ending December 1, and no inmates of the penitentiaries shall be hired or worked in any county on road work during any other period of the year.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-511.

41-22-212. Quarters for inmates — Prison rules applicable.

The commissioner shall provide suitable quarters for the inmates employed on the state or county roads and all rules and regulations of the penitentiaries and all the laws applicable to the control, discipline, protection of or escape of inmates from the penitentiaries shall apply to those quarters and to the inmates wherever at work on the highways or roads.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-512.

41-22-213. Superintendents and guards.

The commissioner is authorized to employ and designate a person or persons as quarters and road superintendents and to employ as many guards as necessary in working inmates on the county roads, pikes, highways or railroads.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-513.

41-22-214. Payments under contract.

Where a contract is made with any county for inmate labor, payments therefor shall be made to the commissioner by the fifteenth of each and every month during the life of the contract.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-514.

41-22-215. Use of inmate labor on federally funded construction.

Power is conferred upon the commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor, to make and enter into agreements and contracts with the commissioner of transportation and any officer or agency of the federal government under the power conferred by any act of congress of the United States granting funds for the construction of roads, for the employment of inmates in the custody of the department of correction on such roads as the officer or agency of the federal government and the state department of transportation may desire to construct or reconstruct in cooperation with the United States government and state of Tennessee, or with the United States government, state of Tennessee and any county, or with the United States government and any county; provided, that no employment shall be required of any inmates that is not safe, healthful and suitable to the physical condition and attainments of the inmates.

The rules of the commissioner of correction as permitted under this part shall be applicable in the employment of the inmates of the penitentiaries upon such agreements and contracts as may be entered into by an officer or agency of the federal government and the state department of transportation.

Acts 1981, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 41-515, 41-516.